Washington statutes.
RCW 41.76.030

Settlement of unresolved matters—Role of commission—Mediation—Other procedures authorized.

(1) The commission shall conduct mediation activities upon the request of either party as a means of assisting in the settlement of unresolved matters considered under this chapter.

(2) If any matter being jointly considered by the exclusive bargaining representative and the board of regents or trustees is not settled by the means provided in this chapter, either party may request the assistance and advice of the commission. Nothing in this section prohibits an employer and an employee organization from agreeing to substitute, at their own expense, some other impasse procedure or other means of resolving matters considered under this chapter.

[ 2002 c 356 s 9.]